Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 11 O.S. 2021, Section 31-102, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 31-102. The municipal governing body may, in its


discretion and by ordinance, place the management and control of the


public library under a library board of directors. The library


board shall consist of at least five but not more than nine


directors, chosen by the municipal governing body with reference to


their fitness for such office. No director shall receive


compensation as such. Directors appointed to the library board


shall hold office for a term of three (3) years from the first day


of May following their appointment, and their terms shall be

Req. No. 2288 Page 1


staggered. The municipal governing body may remove any director for


misconduct or neglect of duty Directors appointed to the library


board shall serve at the pleasure of the municipal governing body


and may be removed without cause. Vacancies in the library board of


directors shall be filled in the same manner as original


appointments.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 65 O.S. 2021, Section 2-103, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2-103. The term of office of each appointive member,


except for initial appointments as herein specified, shall be six


(6) years, beginning July 1 of the year of appointment or until his


successor has been appointed and qualified. The present State


Library Board shall become members of the Board of the Department


and shall continue in office until their respective terms expire.


The Governor shall appoint one member on or before July 1 of each


year; provided that he shall make the first appointments for the


following terms in the years indicated: One member for a term of one


(1) year, and one member for a term of two (2) years in 1967; one


member for a term of two (2) years, one member for a term of three


(3) years and the member-at-large for a term of three (3) years in


1968; one member for a term of three (3) years, and one member for a


term of four (4) years in 1969. After the initial appointments,


terms shall be for six (6) years. Any vacancy on the Board shall be


filled for the remainder of the term only and by the method of the

Req. No. 2288 Page 2


original appointment. No person who has served a full six-year term


shall be appointed to succeed himself. Members may be removed only


for cause Members appointed to the State Library Board shall serve


at the pleasure of the Governor and may be removed without cause.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 65 O.S. 2021, Section 4-103, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4-103. A. The Board of Trustees of a library system


containing two or more counties, herein defined as a multicounty


library system, shall consist of at least five (5) members. There


shall be at least one member from each county appointed by the board


of county commissioners. Additional members shall be appointed for


each city within the system with a public library located in the


city, with these appointments to be made by the governing body of


the city. Should the board serving a multicounty unit result in


fewer than five members, additional board members shall be appointed


on a proportional basis agreed upon by the county governments


involved.


B. Any member serving on a system board as of the effective


date of this act shall continue to serve until the end of the


current term for which they were appointed. Thereafter,


appointments shall be made as provided for in subsection A of this


section.


C. Initial appointments shall be distributed among one-, two-


and three-year terms, with one-third (1/3) of the appointments to be

Req. No. 2288 Page 3


made for one (1) year, one-third (1/3) to be made for two (2) years


and one-third (1/3) for three (3) years. Subsequent appointments


shall be for three-year terms, except in the case of an appointment


to fill a vacancy in the membership of the system board, which


appointment shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term of the


member where death, resignation or removal has created the vacancy.


A partial term of not more than eighteen (18) months served


immediately prior to a full three-year term shall not be counted as


a full term. No person shall serve more than two full successive


terms. Provided that a person who previously served for two (2)


successive terms or less may be reappointed if two (2) years has


expired since the person’s last service on the board. All tenure of


initial and future appointees shall expire on June 30 of the


designated year. A member of a system board once qualified can


thereafter be removed by the appointive authority during his term of


office only for misconduct or neglect of duty without cause.


D. Appointments to the system board shall be made on the basis


of ability, a sound understanding of the total responsibilities and


objectives of public libraries and an active interest in the


attainment of these comprehensive goals. Appointive members shall


be qualified electors and bona fide residents of the counties from


which they are appointed. No member of the system board shall in


any way be connected with the business of publishing or selling



Req. No. 2288 Page 4


books, periodicals or other forms of library materials nor with the


business of manufacturing or selling library supplies or equipment.


E. All system board members shall serve thereon without


compensation except actual and necessary travel expenses as


authorized by the State Travel Reimbursement Act. Individual


memberships for systems board members in state, regional, and


national library associations and expenses incurred in attending


conferences of these associations, board meetings and other library


and library-related meetings may be paid from library funds upon


proper authorization of the board.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 65 O.S. 2021, Section 4-203, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 4-203. A. The board of trustees of a rural single


county library system shall consist of at least five (5) members.


One member shall be appointed from each county commissioner district


by the board of county commissioners. One member shall be appointed


by the governing body of the county seat city or town. A member


shall be appointed from the city or town with the largest population


that is not the county seat.


B. Initial appointments shall be for one-, two-, and three-year


terms. Subsequent appointments shall be for three-year terms,


except in the case of an appointment to fill an unexpired term which


appointment shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term. No


person shall serve more than two full consecutive terms in addition

Req. No. 2288 Page 5


to any partial term served by appointment to fill an unexpired term.


A person who previously served for two consecutive terms or less may


be reappointed if two (2) years has expired since the last service


on the board. All terms shall expire on June 30 of the designated


year. A member of a system board can be removed by shall serve at


the pleasure of the appointing authority during the term for which


appointed only for misconduct or neglect of duty.


C. Appointments to the system board shall be made on the basis


of ability, a sound understanding of the total responsibilities and


objectives of public libraries and active interest in the attainment


of system goals. Appointive members shall be qualified electors and


bona fide residents of the county. No member of the system board


shall be in the business of publishing or selling books, periodicals


or other forms of library materials or the business of manufacturing


or selling library supplies or equipment.


D. All system board members shall serve without compensation


except for actual and necessary travel expenses which shall be


compensated from library funds upon proper authorization of the


board of trustees of the system at the rate provided in the State


Travel Reimbursement Act, Section 500.1 et seq. of Title 74 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. Individual memberships for system board members


in state, regional, and national library associations and expenses


incurred in attending conferences of these associations, board


meetings and other library and library-related meetings may be paid

Req. No. 2288 Page 6


from library funds upon proper authorization of the board of


trustees of the system.


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 65 O.S. 2021, Section 154, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 154. The city-county library commission shall consist


of eleven (11) members. Six of the members shall be appointed by


the mayor of the city subject to approval of the governing body


thereof. Three of the members shall be appointed by the board of


county commissioners. The mayor of the city and the chairman of the


board of county commissioners shall be ex officio members of the


commission and shall be entitled to vote on all matters. The


chairman of the board of county commissioners may designate another


county commissioner to serve in place of the chairman on the


commission. The county commissioner designated by the chairman


shall have the same voting rights as the chairman of the board of


county commissioners. The initial appointments by the city shall


designate two members to serve a term of three (3) years, two


members to serve a term of two (2) years, and two members to serve a


term of one (1) year. The initial appointments by the county shall


designate one member to serve a term of three (3) years, one member


to serve a term of two (2) years, and one member to serve a term of


one (1) year. Provided, that the terms of such initial appointees


and the terms of all future appointees of both the city and county


shall expire on July 31 of that year in which they expire,

Req. No. 2288 Page 7


regardless of the calendar date when such appointments are made.


Subsequent appointments of either the city or the county shall be


for three-year terms, except in the case of an appointment to fill a


vacancy in the membership of the commission, which latter


appointment shall be for the balance of the unexpired term of the


member whose death, resignation, or removal has created the vacancy.


A member of such commission once qualified can thereafter be removed


during his term of office only for misconduct or neglect of duty at


the pleasure of the appointing authority and, if he requests a


hearing before the governing body by which he was appointed, after


such hearing has been held. All members of the commission shall


serve thereon without compensation. Expenses which are incurred by


members pursuant to prior specific authorization by the board of


county commissioners and the governing body of the city shall be


reimbursed, provided that expenses incurred for transportation,


meals, and lodging shall be reimbursed only if incurred in


connection with authorized travel outside the county.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2288 YG 1/15/2026 12:26:13 PM









Req. No. 2288 Page 8